Missouri, session 2026, HB2699.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 575.095 and 575.260, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 575.095 and 575.260, to read as follows:
575.095. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering with a [judicial] court-
related officer if, with the purpose to harass, intimidate, or influence a [judicial] court-
related officer in the performance of such officer's official duties, such person:
(1) Threatens or causes harm to such [judicial] court-related officer or members of
such [judicial] officer's family;
(2) Uses force, threats, or deception against or toward such [judicial] court-related
officer or members of such [judicial] officer's family;
(3) Offers, conveys, or agrees to convey any benefit direct or indirect upon such
[judicial] court-related officer or such [judicial] officer's family;
(4) Engages in conduct reasonably calculated to harass or alarm such [judicial] court-
related officer or such [judicial] officer's family, including stalking pursuant to section
565.225 or 565.227;
(5) Disseminates through any means, including by posting on the internet, the
[judicial officer's or the judicial officer's family's] personal information of the court-related
officer or the officer's family. For purposes of this section, "personal information" [includes
a home address, home or mobile telephone number, personal email address, Social Security
number, federal tax identification number, checking or savings account number, marital
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2699 2
status, and identity of a child under eighteen years of age] shall have the same meaning as
defined in subdivision (5) of subsection 2 of section 476.1300.
2. [A judicial officer] For purposes of this section, the term "court-related officer"
shall [be a judge or commissioner of a state or federal court, arbitrator, special master,
juvenile officer, deputy juvenile officer, state prosecuting or circuit attorney, state assistant
prosecuting or circuit attorney, juvenile court commissioner, state probation or parole officer,
or referee] mean a judge or commissioner of a Missouri court, including any division of a
circuit court; a judge or commissioner of a federal court; an arbitrator, special master,
or referee; a juvenile officer or deputy juvenile officer; a state prosecuting or circuit
attorney or assistant prosecuting or circuit attorney; a court reporter; a circuit clerk,
deputy circuit clerk, court administrator, division clerk, or municipal clerk; or a state
probation or parole officer.
3. A [judicial] court-related officer's family for purposes of this section shall be:
(1) Such officer's spouse; or
(2) Such officer or such officer's spouse's ancestor or descendant by blood or
adoption; or
(3) Such officer's stepchild, while the marriage creating that relationship exists.
4. The offense of tampering with a [judicial] court-relatedofficer is a class D felony.
5. If a violation of this section results in death or bodily injury to a [judicial] court-
related officer or a member of the [judicial] officer's family, the offense is a class B felony.
6. No person convicted under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 or under
subsection 5 of this section shall be eligible for parole.
575.260. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering with a judicial proceeding if,
with the purpose to influence the official action of a judge, juror, special master, referee,
arbitrator, state prosecuting or circuit attorney, state assistant prosecuting or circuit attorney,
or attorney general in a judicial proceeding, [he or she] such person:
(1) Threatens or causes harm to any person or property; or
(2) Engages in conduct reasonably calculated to harass or alarm such official or juror;
or
(3) Offers, confers, or agrees to confer any benefit, direct or indirect, upon such
official or juror.
2. The offense of tampering with a judicial proceeding is a class D felony.
3. No person convicted under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section shall
be eligible for parole.
✔